Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4354.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3-8-201 of Title 27A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Salt Cedar
Eradication Act".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3-8-202 of Title 27A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Req. No. 14764 Page 1

A. As used in this act:
1. "Eligible landowners" means private, tribal, and public
landowners in Oklahoma counties within the Upper North Fork of the
Red River Basin;
2. "Eradication" means the removal or substantial reduction of
Salt Cedar populations to a level where they no longer pose a
significant threat; and
3. "Salt Cedar" means all species within the genus Tamarix
identified as invasive or noxious in Oklahoma.
B. There is hereby created a program to control and eradicate
invasive Salt Cedar species in Oklahoma counties within the Upper
North Fork of the Red River Basin and is to be administered by the
Oklahoma Conservation Commission in collaboration with the Oklahoma
Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry and the Oklahoma Water
Resources Board. To accomplish the goals listed in this section,
the Commission is authorized to use the funds available in the Salt
Cedar Eradication Revolving Fund established in Section 3 of this
act. The purpose of the program is to manage and eradicate invasive
Salt Cedar species in Oklahoma counties within the Upper North Fork
of the Red River Basin, to enhance water resources, restore native
ecosystems, and protect agricultural productivity.
C. The Oklahoma Conservation Commission, in collaboration with
the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry and the

Req. No. 14764 Page 2

Okla homa Water Resources Board, shall establish and oversee the Salt
Cedar eradication program which shall include:
1. Conducting surveys to identify and map Salt Cedar
infestations in Oklahoma counties within the Upper North Fork of the
Red River Basin;
2. Developing and implementing science-based eradication
strategies, including mechanical removal, chemical treatments, and
biological controls;
3. Providing technical and financial assistance to eligible
landowners; and
4. Monitoring and evaluating the effectiveness of eradication
efforts.
D. The Oklahoma Conservation Commission shall establish
guidelines for participation, including cost-sharing arrangements
and reimbursement opportunities.
E. The Oklahoma Conservation Commission is authorized to
promulgate any rules and procedures to effectuate the provisions of
this act.
F. The Oklahoma Conservation Commission shall submit an annual
report to the Governor, Speaker of the Oklahoma House of
Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State
Senate, and the chairs of the appropriation committees of the
Oklahoma House of Representatives and the Oklahoma State Senate
outlining the following:
Req. No. 14764 Page 3

1. Progress of eradication efforts;
2. Expenditures and funding needs; and
3. Recommendations for continued Salt Cedar management.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3-8-203 of Title 27A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the Oklahoma Conservation Commission to be designated the "Salt
Cedar Eradication Revolving Fund". The fund shall be a continuing
fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of
all monies received by the Oklahoma Conservation Commission from
appropriations, federal grants or funds, municipal contributions,
private contributions, and any other sources, including interest
earned from the income in the fund, that are designated for deposit
to such fund or designated for duties associated with removal and
eradication of Salt Cedars in Oklahoma counties within the Upper
North Fork of the Red River Basin. All monies accruing to the
credit of said fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and
expended by the Oklahoma Conservation Commission to perform the
duties imposed on the Commission by law. Expenditures from said
fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer
against claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services for approval and
payment.
Req. No. 14764 Page 4

SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-14764 JL 01/08/26

















Req. No. 14764 Page 5